Wyoming, session 2026, SF0017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-1-502 and 36-1-503(b) are amended
to read:
36-1-502. Wyoming state forestry good neighbor
authority revolving account; creation; investment of funds;
authorized expenditures.
(a) There is created the Wyoming state forestry good
neighbor authority revolving account. The account shall
include all legislative appropriations, federal funds,
county funds, partner funds, funds generated from good
neighbor authority projects or other federally funded
cooperative forest management projects, grants, gifts,
transfers, bequests, donations and all income from
investments of monies in the account. The state forester is
specifically empowered to accept grants, gifts, transfers,
bequests and donations for deposit in the account,
including those which are limited in their purpose by the
grantor except as provided in W.S. 36-1-503(a)(vi). If a
contract is entered into pursuant to W.S. 36-1-503(a)(iii),
funds in the account may be expanded on good neighbor
authority projects prior to receipt of federal fund
reimbursements. Funds deposited into the account are
continuously appropriated to the state forester to be
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0017
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
expended only as provided in this section. Unless otherwise
specifically provided, appropriations to the account shall
not lapse or revert at the end of any fiscal period.
(b) Upon written approval of the state forester,
expenditures shall be made out of the account for good
neighbor authority projects, or other cooperative forest
management projects or hiring additional employees under
W.S. 36-1-503(b).
36-1-503. Powers and duties of state forester.
(b) The state forester may hire additional employees
as necessary to conduct good neighbor authority projects or
other federally funded cooperative forest management
projects funded through the account. Employees hired under
this subsection shall be funded using federal funds
deposited in the account. The state forester shall not fill
more than four (4) full-time employee positions and six (6)
at-will employee contract positions under this subsection.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0017
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3